Utah statutes.
57-1-45.   Boundary line agreements.

(1)  If properly executed and acknowledged as required under this chapter, an agreement between property owners designating the boundary line between their properties, when recorded in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property is located, shall act as a quitclaim deed and convey all of each party's right, title, interest, and estate in property outside the agreed boundary line that had been the subject of the boundary dispute that led to the boundary line agreement.

(2)  Each boundary line agreement under Subsection (1) shall contain a description of the land conveyed and the address of each grantee.

